Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2108
Assessments and directed-payment programs; treatment; retroactive.

Assessments and directed-payment programs shall be treated as a separate component in developing rates paid to hospitals and shall not be included with existing rate components. The assessments and directed-payment programs shall be retroactive to July 1, 2024, or the effective date approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

Laws 2024, LB1087, § 8.